District of Columbia statutes.
9-107.62

Authority of the Chief Financial Officer.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this part, the Mayor shall implement the provisions of this part in a manner consistent with the authority of the Chief Financial Officer under § 1-204.24d.

Sept. 23, 2009, D.C. Law 18-54, § 13, 56 DCR 5694